Missouri, session 2026, HB3164.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 138.390, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 138.390, to read as follows:
138.390. 1. The state tax commission shall equalize the valuation of real and tangible
personal property among the several counties in the state in the following manner: with the
abstracts of all the taxable property in the several counties of the state and the abstracts of the
sales of real estate in such counties as returned by the respective county clerks and the
assessor of the city of St. Louis, the commission shall classify all real estate situate in cities,
towns, and villages, as town lots, and all other real estate as farming lands, and shall classify
all tangible personal property as follows: banking corporations, railroad corporations, street
railroad corporations, all other corporations, horses, mares and geldings, mules, asses and
jennets, neat cattle, sheep, swine, goats, domesticated small animals and all other livestock,
poultry, power machinery, farm implements, other tangible personal property.
2. (1) The state tax commission shall equalize the valuation of each class or subclass
of property thereof among the respective counties of the state in the following manner:
[(1)] (a) It shall add to the valuation of each class, subclass, or portion thereof of the
property, real or tangible personal, of each county which it believes to be valued below its real
value in money such amount or percent as will increase the same in each case to its true value;
[(2)] (b) It shall deduct from the valuation of each class, subclass, or portion thereof
of the property, real or tangible personal, of each county which it believes to be valued above
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3164 2
its real value in money such amount or percent as will reduce the same in each case to its true
value.
(2) (a) For the purposes of this subsection, the state tax commission shall utilize
ratio studies to determine whether a class or subclass of property is valued below or
above its true value in money.
(b) A class or subclass of property shall be considered to be valued below its true
value in money if:
a. The weighted median ratio is less than seventy percent and the coefficient of
dispersion is greater than twenty-five percent; or
b. The weighted median ratio is less than seventy percent and the upper bound
of the ninety-five percent confidence interval for the weighted median is less than
seventy percent.
(c) A class or subclass of property shall be considered to be valued above its true
value in money if:
a. The weighted median ratio is greater than one hundred percent and the
coefficient of dispersion is greater than twenty-five percent; or
b. The weighted median ratio is greater than one hundred percent and the upper
bound of the ninety-five percent confidence interval for the weighted median is greater
than one hundred percent.
✔